Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5904
Administrator; discretion.

Assisted living promotes resident self-direction and participation in decisions which emphasize independence, individuality, privacy, and dignity.

The administrator shall have the discretion regarding admission or retention of residents of the assisted-living facility subject to the Assisted-Living Facility Act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.

Laws 1997, LB 608, § 14;

R.S.Supp.,1998, § 71-20,116;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 61;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-461;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 48;

Laws 2018, LB439, § 5.
July 19, 2018